lib/dict/bs_BA.dic
advokatski/Z
agregiran/Z
agresivan/X
akreditovan/Z
aku¹erski/Z
alatni/X
alpski/Z
amorfan/X
analfabetski/Z
aneksioni/Z
antagonistièki/Z
antikomunistièki/Z
apologetski/Z
apsurdan/X
arapski/Z
aristokratski/Z
artistièki/Z
asocijativan/X
atmosferski/Z
automobilski/Z
avnojski/Z
baèen/X
badnji/Z
bankovni/Z
barometarski/Z
beèejski/Z
beèki/X
bescarinski/Z
beskoristan/Y
beskrupulozan/X
bespotreban/X
be¹èastan/Y
be¹æutan/X
bezgradijentan/X
beznade¾an/X
bezuspje¹an/X
bibliografski/Z
bijedan/X
biraèki/Z
biv¹i/Y
bizaran/X
bjedniji/Z
bla¾i/Y
bli¾i/Y
bli¾nji/Z
bljeði/Y
bojen/X
bokeljski/Z
bolestan/Y
boravi¹ni/Z
bo¾iji/Z
brèanski/Z
bri¾an/X
brojèan/Z
br¾i/Y
budvanski/Z
bujan/X
bur¾oaski/Z
cementni/Z
cestovni/Z
cijenjen/X
civilni/Z
cjelokupan/X
crtaæi/Z
èastan/Y
èehoslovaèki/Z
èemeran/X
èetnièki/Z
èiji/Y
èika¹ki/X
èili/Y
èitalaèki/Z
èujan/X
èukarièki/Z
dalmatinski/Z
darovan/Z
debeli/X
definisan/Z
definitivan/X
dekorisan/Z
demonstriran/Z
destimulativan/X
de¹ifrovan/Z
didaktièki/Z
difuzan/X
dinamièniji/Z
direktan/X
disciplinovan/Z
distributivni/Z
djeèiji/Z
djelomièan/X
dobni/Z
dobronamjeran/X
dodjeljivan/Z
dokumentaran/X
dokumentovan/Z
domobranski/Z
dopremljen/X
dopunjujuæi/Z
dosljedan/X
dotada¹nji/Z
dotuèen/X
dragocjen/X
dra¾estan/Y
dra¾i/Y
drugaèiji/Z
dru¹tven/X
dr¾avni/Z
dugometra¾ni/Z
duvanski/Z
du¾an/X
du¾i/Y
dvokrilni/Z
dvomjeseèan/X
dvovrstan/Y
ðavolski/Z
efektivan/X
egejski/Z
eklatantan/X
eksperimentalan/X
ekspertni/Z
ekvivalentan/X
elastièniji/Z
elektronski/Z
eminentan/X
empirijski/Z
epidemiolo¹ki/X
erotizovan/Z
etièan/X
etnografski/Z
fakturisan/Z
fanatièan/X
federalni/Z
filozofijski/Z
finalan/X
fizikalni/Z
formalizovan/Z
fotografski/Z
frenetièan/X
frontovski/Z
gajen/X
garantovan/Z
generatorski/Z
geotermièki/Z
glaði/Y
glagolja¹ki/X
glavni/Z
gori/Y
gorki/X
gorski/Z
gradijentni/Z
gramofonski/Z
gravidan/X
grièki/Z
grupni/Z
habsbur¹ki/X
hardverski/Z
hercegovaèki/Z
hermetièan/X
hiljadugodi¹nji/Z
histolo¹ki/X
hljebni/Z
horizantalan/X
huèan/X
human/Z
idealiziran/Z
igraæi/Z
ijedan/X
imitiran/Z
implicitan/X
impresionistièki/Z
indikativan/X
indoevropski/Z
informacioni/Z
ini/X
inokosni/Z
instalacijski/Z
insuficijentan/X
integrisan/Z
interdisciplinaran/X
interniran/Z
inventivan/X
investiran/Z
iscrpljen/X
iskazan/Z
iskrivljen/X
iskusniji/Z
ispostavljen/X
ispovjedaèki/Z
ispu¹ten/X
istarski/Z
istoriografski/Z
istovjetan/X
istovrstan/Y
i¹èezli/X
izabran/Z
izdavaèki/Z
izgnan/Z
izgovoren/X
izmijenjen/X
iznerviran/Z
izniman/X
izraelski/Z
izrasli/X
izvaðen/X
izvjestan/Y
izvje¹tajni/Z
izvrstan/Y
izvr¹an/X
jaèi/Y
jagnjeæi/Z
japanski/Z
javljen/X
jednodu¹an/X
jednokorisnièki/Z
jednoslo¾an/X
jezerski/Z
jezièan/X
jugoslovenski/Z
jutarnji/Z
kadrovski/Z
kamerni/Z
kanalizacioni/X
kanonski/Z
kartonski/Z
kasan/X
katolièki/Z
keramièki/Z
ki¹an/X
kleèeæi/Z
klimatski/Z
kljuèki/Z
knji¾evan/X
kodni/Z
koji/Y
koliki/X
koloristièki/Z
kompleksan/X
kompleksniji/Z
koncentracioni/Z
koncentrièan/X
konkurentan/X
konstatovan/Z
kontinualan/X
konturni/Z
konusan/X
kopirni/Z
korektan/X
koristan/Y
ko¹tan/Z
kraljevaèki/Z
kra¹ki/X
krepki/X
krepostan/Y
krizni/Z
krnj/X
krupan/X
kuhan/Z
kumov/X
kursorski/Z
kvislin¹ki/X
labuði/Y
laièki/Z
lak¹i/Y
la¾an/X
lednièki/Z
liberalan/X
linearan/X
linijski/Z
lo¹iji/Z
luèan/X
luði/Y
ljep¹i/Y
ljubu¹ki/X
lutajuæi/Y
mad¾arski/Z
magareæi/Y
magistralan/X
malajski/Z
malodoban/X
manualni/Y
marginalan/X
mar¹alski/Z
maskirajuæi/Y
maslinov/X
mastan/Y
medvjeði/Y
meðumesni/Z
meðusoban/X
mek¹i/Y
memorisan/Z
metaforièan/X
migracioni/Z
milioniti/X
milostan/Y
minuli/X
mi¹ji/Z
mjerodavan/X
mlaèi/Y
mlaði/Y
mobilan/X
mobilizatorski/Z
momentalan/X
monopolistièki/Z
moralan/X
mrtvaèki/Z
mr¾i/Y
muèki/X
mutan/X
nacionalsocijalistièki/Z
naèinjen/X
nadreðen/X
naelektrisan/Z
nagovije¹ten/X
najbla¾i/Y
najbli¾i/Y
najbr¾i/Y
najèasniji/Z
najdra¾i/Y
najdu¾i/Y
najgori/Y
najinteresantniji/Z
najjaèi/Y
najlak¹i/Y
najluksuzniji/Z
najljep¹i/Y
najni¾i/Y
najokorjeliji/Z
najposjeæeniji/Z
najracionalniji/Z
najskuplji/Z
naj¹iri/Y
najte¾i/Y
najuèestaliji/Z
naju¾i/Y
najvi¹i/Y
najvulgarniji/Z
naklonjen/X
namoèen/X
napisan/Z
napredan/X
naruèen/X
nasmije¹en/X
nastavnièki/Z
natalo¾en/X
navije¹æen/X
neaktivan/X
neèastan/Y
neèujan/X
nedosljedan/X
nedozvoljen/X
neekonomski/Z
negativan/X
neiskrèen/X
neizmiren/X
neizvjestan/Y
nekompletan/X
nekoristan/Y
nemarksistièki/Z
nemilosrdan/X
nenadma¹en/X
neobavezan/X
neodgovoran/X
neopremljen/X
neosnovan/Z
neo¹teæen/X
nepismen/X
nepokoren/X
nepo¹tedan/X
nepravedan/X
nepresu¹an/X
neprimjeren/X
neprobojan/X
nepromoèan/X
neravan/X
nerealan/X
nervni/Z
nesiguran/X
nesmotren/X
nesretan/X
nesuðen/X
nesvjestan/Y
neujednaèen/X
neumjestan/Y
neupotrebljen/X
neuslovan/X
neveseo/X
nezaboravan/X
nezgodan/X
nigerijski/Z
nikakvi/X
ni¾i/Y
norve¹ki/X
notarski/Z
novozelandski/Z
nulti/X
obavije¹ten/X
obièan/X
obijestan/Y
obimniji/Z
objektivan/X
obogaæen/X
obrazlo¾en/X
obrenovaèki/Z
ocvao/X
oèuvan/Z
odbojan/X
odluèan/X
odomaæen/X
odreðeniji/Z
oduran/X
oformljen/X
ohrabren/X
ohridski/Z
okrugli/X
olak¹an/Z
omalen/X
onemoguæen/X
opasniji/Z
opæeprihvaæen/X
opæi/Y
opisni/Z
opremljen/X
op¹tedru¹tven/X
op¹tenarodni/Z
op¹ti/Y
orijentiran/Z
orlov/X
osjeæajan/X
osmobitan/X
osnivan/Z
osuðen/X
o¹tri/X
otklonski/Z
otpu¹ten/X
ovalan/X
ozbiljan/X
ozbiljniji/Z
padajuæi/Y
pakostan/Y
paleolo¹ki/X
panonski/Z
paradan/X
parohijalni/Z
partikularan/X
pa¾ljiviji/Z
pedantan/X
personificiran/Z
pileæi/Z
pjesnikov/X
pjevan/Z
platinski/Z
ploveæi/Z
pobakren/X
poèe¹ljan/Z
podesan/X
podreðen/X
podrobniji/Z
podu¾i/Y
poga¹en/X
pogdjekoji/Y
pohaban/Z
pohlepan/X
pokretaèki/Z
pokriven/X
polak¹i/Y
politiziran/Z
poluotvoren/X
pomije¹an/Z
ponajjaèi/Y
ponajvi¹i/Y
ponesen/X
popodnevni/Z
poprimljen/X
poroðajni/Z
posjeèen/X
posmatran/Z
postan/Y
postiðen/X
potjeran/Z
potkrepljen/X
pouèan/X
poveæan/Z
povijestan/Y
pozajmljen/X
poznatiji/Z
pra¹umski/Z
pravedan/X
prebrojen/X
predajni/Z
predstavnièki/Z
prega¾en/X
prehrambeni/Z
prekriven/X
premje¹ten/X
preostao/X
preran/Z
presaðen/X
pretopljen/X
pretstavljan/Z
prevashodan/X
pre¾aljen/X
pribojski/Z
prijavljen/X
prikazivan/Z
primijeæen/X
pripisan/Z
pripremljen/X
pristrastan/Y
pristupaèan/X
prizrenski/Z
probitaèan/X
proganjan/Z
progonjen/X
proklamovan/Z
proma¹en/X
propisan/Z
propustan/Y
prosvijeæen/X
protestantski/Z
proveden/X
prvobitni/Z
prvoroðen/X
pukovski/Z
racionalan/X
raèiji/Z
radostan/Y
rasformiran/Z
rasipan/X
rasprostranjeniji/Z
raspu¹ten/X
ravnodu¹an/X
razarajuæi/Z
razgovoran/X
raznije¾en/X
raznovrstan/Y
razredni/Z
razveden/X
recitatorski/Z
registarski/Z
regularan/X
religijski/Z
respektirajuæi/Z
restriktivan/X
rezultujuæi/Z
robni/Z
rodan/X
rudnièki/Z
sablastan/Y
saèinjavajuæi/Z
sadr¾ajan/X
samoupravan/X
samoupravljaèki/Z
savanski/Z
savjestan/Y
sedamnaesti/X
sedmodnevni/Z
separatistièki/Z
sferièan/X
sigurniji/Z
sintaksni/Z
sintetièan/X
sjevernoamerièki/Z
sklerotièan/X
skoriji/Z
skuplji/Y
slabouman/X
slikan/Z
smanjen/X
smederevski/Z
smu¹en/X
softverski/Z
sparan/X
splitski/Z
sporazuman/X
spremniji/Z
srazmjeran/X
sremski/Z
stalo¾en/X
standardizovan/Z
stezni/Z
stonski/Z
stradao/X
strastan/Y
stro¾i/Y
studijski/Z
sudbonosan/X
sudski/Z
superioran/X
su¹i/Y
suvoparan/X
svakovrstan/Y
sveèan/Z
sveobuhvatan/X
svjestan/Y
svjetliji/Z
svojevrstan/Y
¹ahovski/X
¹ematski/Z
¹iri/Y
¹tabski/Z
tajnièki/Z
taktièan/X
tehnièki/Z
temeljitiji/Z
temperamentan/X
teroristièki/Z
te¾i/Y
ti¹i/Y
titogradski/Z
tolerantan/X
topografski/Z
trebaèki/Z
trideseti/X
tr¹iæki/X
trubadurski/Z
tvrði/Y
ucrtan/Z
uèevan/X
uga¾en/X
ugovorni/Z
uhap¹en/X
ukopan/Z
ukroæen/X
umjestan/Y
umje¹an/X
umotan/Z
unakrstan/Y
une¹en/X
uoèljiviji/Z
uparen/X
upropa¹æen/X
urban/Z
usagla¹en/X
usmjeravan/Z
usnuli/X
usta¹ki/X
utjecajan/X
uvelièan/Z
uvr¹ten/X
uzurpiran/Z
u¾asan/X
u¾i/Y
varan/Z
veæi/Y
vegetativni/Z
vezen/X
vijetnamski/Z
vi¹ekolonski/Z
vi¹esmjeran/X
vi¹i/Y
vlasenièki/Z
vla¾an/X
volovski/Z
vrstan/Y
vukovarski/Z
vulgaran/X
zadavljen/X
zaduvan/Z
zagorèen/X
zakljuèan/X
zakrpan/Z
zama¹an/X
zaostao/X
zapadnjaèki/Z
zapu¹en/X
zaseban/X
za¹eæeren/X
zatalasan/Z
zavidoviæki/X
zdravstveni/Z
zgotovljen/X
zidan/Z
znaèajan/X
zubni/Z
¾alostan/Y
¾arni/X
¾etveni/Z
¾vakaæi/Z
